Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1143.
do enact as follows:SB1143,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1143,25Section 2. 20.255 (2) (bk) of the statutes is created to read:SB1143,2,7620.255 (2) (bk) Grants for accessible playgrounds. The amounts in the 7schedule for the grants for accessible playgrounds under s. 115.375.SB1143,38Section 3. 115.375 of the statutes is created to read:SB1143,2,159115.375 Grants for accessible playgrounds. From the appropriation 10under s. 20.255 (2) (bk), the department shall establish a grant program to award 11grants to school districts that construct a playground that is accessible to pupils 12with disabilities or upgrade a playground to make it accessible to pupils with 13disabilities. The department may not award a grant under this section to a school 14district in an amount that exceeds the amount the school district expended in the 15construction or upgrade of a playground.SB1143,2,1616